Georgia, session 2025_26, HB156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 6 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general provisions
relative to aviation, is amended by revising Code Section 6-1-1, relating to powers and duties
of Department of Transportation — Aviation and aviation facilities generally, as follows:
"6-1-1.
(a) As used in this title, the term:
(1) 'Landing field' shall include a vertiport.
H. B. 156
- 1 -

HB 156/AP
(2) 'Vertiport' means an area specifically designated and primarily used for the landing,
takeoff, and servicing of aircraft with a maximum takeoff weight of greater than 1,320
pounds that is capable of vertical takeoff and landing.
(b) The Department of Transportation shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) To plan for and establish a long-term policy in regard to the establishment,
development, and maintenance of aviation, landing fields, and aviation facilities in the
this state;
(2) To promote and encourage the use of aviation facilities of the state for air commerce
in the this state and between the state, other states, and foreign countries;
(3) To cooperate, counsel, and advise with the State Transportation Board in regard to
the planning, construction, development, and maintenance of airports, landing fields, and
air navigation facilities in the this state;
(4) To cooperate, counsel, and advise with municipalities and other political subdivisions
of the state and with other departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, agencies, or
establishments, whether federal, state, or local, or public or private, for the purpose of
promoting and obtaining coordination in the planning for and in the establishment of
development, maintenance, and protection of a system of air routes, airports, landing
fields, and other aviation facilities in the this state."
SECTION 2.
Code Section 48-13-50.2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to definitions
relative to excise tax on rooms, lodgings, and accommodations, is amended in paragraph (6)
by striking "or" at the end of subparagraph (O), by replacing the period with "; and" at the
end of subparagraph (P), and by adding a new subparagraph to read as follows:
"(Q) Air service product expansion at air carrier airports."
H. B. 156
- 2 -

HB 156/AP
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 156
- 3 -